Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1460.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 10, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024, as amended by Section 4, Chapter 187, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 20J), is amended to read as follows:
Section 20J. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class B5 shall include the following criminal
offenses:
1. Second or subsequent conviction for assault and battery
against a current or former intimate partner or a family or
household member, as provided for in subsection C of Section 644 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
2. Second or subsequent conviction for domestic abuse committed
in the presence of a child, as provided for in subsection G of
Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
3. Assault and battery by strangulation or attempted
strangulation against an intimate partner or a family or household
member, as provided for in subsection J of Section 644 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
4. Aggravated assault and battery, as provided for in Section
646 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
5. Battery or assault and battery upon a police officer,
sheriff, deputy sheriff, highway patrolman, corrections personnel,
or other state peace officer, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 649 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. Striking or mistreating a police dog or police horse during
the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 649.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
7. Disfiguring, disabling, or killing a police dog or police
horse during the commission of a misdemeanor or felony, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 649.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
8. Battery or assault and battery resulting in bodily injury to
any employee of the Office of Juvenile Affairs or residential
facility, as provided for in subsection E of Section 650.2 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
9. Assault with intent to kill, as provided for in Section 653
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
10. Assault with intent to commit any felony, as provided for
in Section 681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
11. Manslaughter in the second degree, as provided for in
Section 716 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
12. Owning a mischievous animal that kills a human being, as
provided for in Section 717 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
13. Causing, aiding, abetting, or encouraging a minor to commit
or participate in committing a felony offense, as provided for in

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

subs ection C of Section 856 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
14. Causing, aiding, abetting, encouraging, soliciting, or
recruiting a minor to participate, join, or associate with any
criminal street gang, as provided for in subsection D of Section 856
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
15. Committing a gang-related offense as a condition of
membership in a criminal street gang, as provided for in Section
856.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
16. Stalking, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1173
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
17. Second or subsequent conviction of stalking or committing
the act of stalking within ten (10) years of the completion of
sentence for a prior conviction of stalking, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1173 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
18. Intentionally or recklessly spreading an infectious
disease, as provided for in Section 1192.1 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
19. Entering the premises of another while masked or disguised
with the intent to inflict bodily injury or injury to property, as
provided for in Section 1302 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

20. Assault with a dangerous weapon while masked or in
disguise, as provided for in Section 1303 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
21. Unlawful assembly for the purpose of engaging in a riot, as
provided for in Section 1320.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
22. Acts of cruelty to animals, as provided for in Section 1685
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
23. Instigating or encouraging any cockfight, as provided for
in Section 1692.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
24. Keeping a pit or other place or knowingly providing
equipment or facilities for cockfighting, as provided for in Section
1692.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
25. Servicing or facilitating a cockfight, as provided for in
Section 1692.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
26. Owning, possessing, keeping, or training any bird for
cockfighting, as provided for in Section 1692.5 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
27. Instigating or encouraging any fight between dogs, as
provided for in Section 1694 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
28. Keeping a house, pit, or other place, or providing any
equipment or facilities to be used for any fight between dogs, as

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov ided for in Section 1695 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
29. Acting or performing any service in the furtherance of or
facilitating any dogfight, as provided for in Section 1696 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
30. Owning, possessing, keeping, or training any dog with
intent to have such dog fight another dog, as provided for in
Section 1697 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
31. Second or subsequent offense of watching, gazing, or
looking upon a person in a clandestine manner as provided for in
paragraph 2 of subsection A of Section 1171 of this title;
32. Using photographic, electronic, or video equipment in
clandestine manner as provided for in subsection B of Section 1171
of this title;
33. Second or subsequent offense of using photographic,
electronic, or video equipment in clandestine manner to capture
image of private area without consent as provided for in paragraph 2
of subsection C of Section 1171 of this title;
34. Failing to stop for an accident resulting in a nonfatal
injury to another person, as provided for in Section 10-102 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. 35. Personal injury accident while driving or operating a
motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating
substance while having a previous conviction for driving or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

oper ating a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or
other intoxicating substance, as provided for in paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 11-904 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. 36. Failure to register as a sex offender, as provided for
in Section 583 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. 37. Furnishing false or misleading information in the
registration required by the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as
provided for in Section 586 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. 38. Failure to comply with the Sex Offenders Registration
Act, as provided for in subsection A of Section 587 of Title 57 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
36. 39. Failure to comply with established guidelines of
global-positioning-system Global Positioning System (GPS) monitoring
pursuant to the provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 587 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
37. 40. Temporarily or permanently residing within a two-
thousand-foot radius of a public or private school site or other
listed places by a person required to register pursuant to the Sex
Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in subsection A of
Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. 41. Residing with a minor child after being convicted of an
offense that involved a minor child by a person required to register

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

purs uant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 590 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. 42. Two or more sex offenders residing together in a
dwelling during the term of registration as a sex offender, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 590.1 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes; and
40. 43. Establishing, leasing, operating, or owning any
structure where persons required to register pursuant to the Sex
Offenders Registration Act are allowed to reside, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 590.1 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class B5 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished in accordance with the
corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 14, Chapter 366, O.S.L.
2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 20N), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 20N. A. Upon the effective date of this act On or
after January 1, 2026, Class D1 shall include the following criminal
offenses:
1. Public warehouse and/or or commodity stock fraud, as
provided for in Section 9-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. False issuance of warehouse receipt, as provided for in
Section 9-35 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Misrepresentation of charter, as provided for in Section 9-
36 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Tampering with anhydrous equipment, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 11-10 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Willfully burn forest, grass, crops, or woodlands, as
provided for in Section 16-25 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Willful and unlawful burning of forest, grass, croplands,
rangeland, or other wild lands by owner, as provided for in Section
16-28.1 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Possession of incendiary device with the intent to burn, as
provided for in Section 16-34 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Operate aircraft not registered with the Federal Aviation
Administration Office of Aircraft Registry or foreign country, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 258 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
9. Supply false information in regard to aircraft ownership, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 258 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Concealing identity of aircraft, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 258 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 259 of Title 3 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

12. Destruction of registration or serial number on aircraft
with intent to conceal, as provided for in subsection B of Section
259 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
13. Sell, purchase, or possess aircraft with removed or
falsified identification number with intent to misrepresent the
identity of aircraft, as provided for in subsection D of Section 259
of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
14. Operating aircraft under the influence of alcohol, second
or subsequent offense within ten (10) years, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
15. Operating aircraft under the influence of intoxicant,
second or subsequent offense with ten (10) years, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 301 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
16. Unauthorized use of aircraft, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 321 of Title 3 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
17. Charge fee for horse race without a license, as provided
for in Section 205 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
18. Pari-mutuel wagering without a license, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 208.4 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
19. Entering racehorse under false name, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Entering racehorse without name being registered, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 208.6 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

21. Using racing stimulating devices, as provided for in
Section 208.7 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
22. Racetrack bribery or ticket falsification, as provided for
in Section 208.8 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
23. Unauthorized wagering on horse racing, as provided for in
Section 208.9 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
24. Falsification of information on racehorse, as provided for
in Section 208.10 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
25. Administer a drug or medication without authorization to
horse prior to racing, as provided for in subsection C of Section
208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
26. Violation of horse racing drug provisions, as provided for
in subsection D of Section 208.11 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
27. Forging and/or or counterfeiting state lottery ticket, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 727 of Title 3A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
28. Influence lottery win by fraud, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 727 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
29. Own dog that attacks and kills a person, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
30. Release dog on law enforcement officer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 42.4 of Title 4 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

31. Pledging assets of bank as collateral, as provided in
Section 809 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
32. Unlawful compensation of bank officer, as provided for in
Section 1405 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
33. Receipt of deposits while insolvent, as provided for in
Section 1406 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
34. Unlawful service as bank officer or director, as provided
for in Section 1407 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
35. Serving as bank commissioner, administrative assistant, or
assistant banking commissioner with a felony conviction, as provided
for in Section 1408 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
36. Concealing bank transaction, as provided for in Section
1409 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
37. Improper maintenance of accounts or false or deceptive
entries and statements, as provided for in Section 1410 of Title 6
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
38. Payment of penalties and judgments against others, as
provided for in Section 1411 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
39. Embezzlement of bank funds, as provided for in Section 1412
of Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
40. Circulation of statement or representation for the purpose
of injuring any bank institution, as provided for in Section 1413 of
Title 6 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

41. Authorizing, executing, or ratifying a criminal offense, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
42. Violation of any lawful order of the Board or Commissioner,
as provided for in subsection C of Section 1414 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
43. Bank advertising with confusingly similar name, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
44. Using shortened confusingly similar name for advertising,
as provided for in subsection B of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
45. Acquiring another bank but using former name, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
46. Non-banking business using confusingly similar name, as
provided for in subsection D of Section 1417 of Title 6 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
47. Registered sex offender providing services in a child care
facility, as provided for in subsection F of Section 404.1 of Title
10 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
48. Failure to report child abuse, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1-2-101 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

49. Interception of wire, oral, or electronic communication, as
provided for in paragraph 1 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
50. Using devices to intercept oral communication, as provided
for in paragraph 2 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
51. Disclosing contents of wire, oral, or electronic
communication, as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 176.3 of
Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
52. Using contents of wire, oral, or electronic communication,
as provided for in paragraph 4 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
53. Removing, injuring, or obstructing telephone line, as
provided for in paragraph 5 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
54. Carrying devices for interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section
176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
55. Making devices for interception of wire, oral, or
electronic communication, as provided for in paragraph 7 of Section
176.3 of Title 13 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
56. Using communication facility in committing felonies, as
provided for in paragraph 8 of Section 176.3 of Title 13 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

57. Violation of the Oklahoma Consumer Protection Act, as
provided for in Section 753 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
58. Violation of the Home Repair Fraud Act, as provided for in
Section 765.3 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
59. Conduct closing-out sale without license, as provided for
in Section 767 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
60. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act, as provided
for in Section 776.1 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
61. Violation of the Unlawful Electronic Mail Act for
commercial electronic mail, as provided for in Section 776.6 of
Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
62. Conceal or destroy corporation records, as provided for in
Section 16 of Title 17 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
63. Misapplication of funds, as provided for in Section 411 of
Title 18 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
64. Solicit funds to secure old age assistance by deception or
fraud, as provided for in Section 553.1 of Title 18 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
65. Inspector, judge, or clerk refusing to extend or enforce
the right to sign and deliver the certificate of election votes, as
provided for in Section 90 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
66. Knowing and willful failure or refusal to perform duties,
as provided for in Section 91 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

67. County officer failing to make daily deposit, as provided
for in Section 682 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
68. Use of false or illegal voucher by county official, as
provided for in Section 686 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
69. Gift to influence legislator, as provided for in Section
318 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
70. Legislator receiving payoff for employment of other, as
provided for in Section 321 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
71. Lobbying legislature on contingency fee basis, as provided
for in Section 334 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
72. Furnishing public supplies for profit, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 355 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
73. Purchase public supplies from business that employs family
member or spouse with more than five percent (5%) interest, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 355 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
74. Make false claim against the state, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 358 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
75. Bribing an officer, as provided for in Section 381 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

76. Bribing participant or official in athletic contest, as
provided for in Section 399 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
77. Engaging in pattern of criminal offenses, as provided for
in Section 425 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
78. Escape from county or city jail, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
79. Escape from the Department of Corrections or alternative
incarceration, as provided for in subsection B of Section 443 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
80. Escape from juvenile detention facility, as provided for in
subsection E of Section 443 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
81. Unauthorized entry into penal institution or jail, as
provided for in Section 445 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
82. Preparing false evidence, as provided for in Section 453 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
83. Bribing witness to falsely testify, as provided for in
Section 456 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
84. Larceny or destruction of records by clerk or officer, as
provided for in Section 461 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

85. Larceny or destruction of records by person other than
officers, as provided for in Section 462 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
86. Offer forged or false instruments for the record, as
provided for in Section 463 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
87. Perjury, as provided for in Section 491 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
88. Contradictory statements as perjury, as provided for in
Section 496 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
89. Perjury by subornation, as provided for in Section 504 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
90. Falsify public record, as provided for in Section 531 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
91. Fortifying access point to place where felony is being
committed, as provided for in Section 540C of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
92. Compounding a crime, as provided for in Section 543 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
93. Substitute a child to deceive a parent or guardian, as
provided for in Section 579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
94. Record, listen to, or observe jury proceedings, as provided
for in Section 588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

95. Abuse, sexual abuse, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
96. Neglect of a vulnerable adult, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 843.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
97. Procuring an abortion, as provided for in Section 861 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
98. Adultery, as provided for in Section 871 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
99. Bigamy, as provided for in Section 881 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
100. Knowingly marrying a bigamist, as provided for in Section
884 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
101. Confidence game by cards, as provided for in Section 954
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
102. Dealing in gambling devices, as provided for in Section
984 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
103. Install communication of gambling information, as provided
for in Section 986 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
104. Dissemination of gambling information, as provided for in
Section 987 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
105. Conspiracy to violate gambling laws, as provided for in
Section 988 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

106. Engaging in prostitution while HIV-infected, as provided
for in subsection B of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
107. Engage in or operate prostitution within one thousand
(1,000) feet of a school or church, as provided for in subsection D
of Section 1031 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
108. Interactive computer service provider failing to remove
child pornography, third or subsequent offense, as provided for in
Section 1040.80 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
109. Gain or attempt to gain value from nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images, as provided for in
subsection G of Section 1040.13b of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
110. Sex offender entering safety zone around school, as
provided for in Section 1125 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
111. Unlawful removal of dead body, as provided for in Section
1161 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
112. Purchasing or receiving dead body, as provided for in
Section 1162 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
113. Using photographic, electronic, or video equipment in
clandestine manner, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1171
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

114. Obscene, threatening, or harassing phone call, second or
subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1172 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
115. 114. Spreading infectious diseases, as provided for in
Section 1192 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
116. 115. Altering livestock appearance for exhibition, second
or subsequent offense, as provided for in Section 1229 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
117. 116. Unlawfully transport hazardous waste, as provided for
in Section 1230.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
118. 117. Unlawful waste management, as provided for in Section
1230.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
119. 118. False statements and acts concerning permits and
waste, as provided for in Section 1230.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
120. 119. Unlawful disposal of hazardous waste, as provided for
in Section 1230.6 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
121. 120. Attempts to violate the Sabotage Prevention Act, as
provided for in Section 1265.4 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
122. 121. Carry weapon with intent to injure another, as
provided for in Section 1278 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

123. 122. Teaching, demonstrating, or training use of firearms
in furtherance of riot, as provided for in Section 1320.10 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
124. 123. Delivering fraudulent bill of lading, as provided for
in Section 1411 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
125. 124. Maintaining fraudulent warehouse receipts, as
provided for in Section 1412 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
126. 125. Issuing duplicate bills of lading or warehouse
receipts, as provided for in Section 1414 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
127. 126. Selling goods without consent of holder of bill of
lading, as provided for in Section 1415 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
128. 127. Unlawful delivery of goods, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1416 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
129. 128. Burglary in the third degree, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1435 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
130. 129. Embezzlement of property, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

($15 ,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1451 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
131. 130. Extortion, as provided for in Section 1481 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
132. 131. Extortion induced by threats, as provided for in
Section 1482 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
133. 132. Obtain signatures by extortion, as provided for in
Section 1485 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
134. 133. Extortion by threatening letter, as provided for in
Section 1486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
135. 134. Blackmail, as provided for in Section 1488 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
136. 135. Defrauding hotel, inn, or restaurant, value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1503 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
137. 136. Renting motor vehicle with bogus check, value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1521 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
138. 137. Receive money or property by impersonating another,
value from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of
Section 1532 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
139. 138. False use of “State Police” with intent to
communicate policing authority, and another is injured, defrauded,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

hara ssed, or vexed, as provided for in subsection G of Section 1533
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
140. 139. Identity theft, as provided for in Section 1533.1 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
141. 140. Felony value – false pretense, bogus check, con game,
valued from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1541.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
142. 141. Two or more false or bogus checks, valued from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1541.3 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
143. 142. Obtaining money or property with false negotiable
paper, as provided for in Section 1544 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
144. 143. Signs credit or debit card with intent to defraud, as
provided for in subsection (a) A of Section 1550.28 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
145. 144. Possess credit or debit card of another with intent
to defraud, as provided for in subsection (b) B of Section 1550.28
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
146. 145. Possessing incomplete credit cards with intent to
complete, as provided for in Section 1550.31 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

147. 146. Possess firearm with altered ID during commission of
a felony, as provided for in subsection A of Section 1550 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
148. 147. Make, sell, or display false identification for
felony purposes or to mislead police officer, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1550.41 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
149. 148. Forgery of state, public, court, or corporate seals,
as provided for in Section 1571 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
150. 149. Forgery of records, as provided for in Section 1572
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
151. 150. Making false entry in records, as provided for in
Section 1573 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
152. 151. Forgery of certification or acknowledgement of
conveyance, as provided for in Section 1574 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
153. 152. Forgery II / Forgery III, valued from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1577 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
154. 153. Possession of forged evidence of debt, valued from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Doll ars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1578 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
155. 154. Possession of other forged instrument, valued from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1579 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
156. 155. Issuing spurious or false certificates of stock, as
provided for in Section 1580 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
157. 156. Reissuing canceled certificates of stock, as provided
for in Section 1581 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
158. 157. Issuing or pledging false evidence of debt, as
provided for in Section 1582 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
159. 158. Counterfeiting coin, as provided for in Section 1583
of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
160. 159. Counterfeiting coin for exportation, as provided for
in Section 1584 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
161. 160. Forging process of court or title to property, as
provided for in Section 1585 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
162. 161. Making false entries in public book, as provided for
in Section 1586 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 26
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

163. 162. Forging tickets of passage, as provided for in
Section 1587 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
164. 163. Forging postage stamps, as provided for in Section
1588 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
165. 164. Falsification of corporate records, as provided for
in Section 1589 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
166. 165. Employee making false entries, as provided for in
Section 1590 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
167. 166. Possessing counterfeit coin with intent to circulate,
as provided for in Section 1591 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
168. 167. Uttering forged instruments, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section 1592 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
169. 168. Falsely procuring another’s signature, as provided
for in Section 1593 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
170. 169. Utter signature of another with same name, as
provided for in Section 1622 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
171. 170. Uttering one’s endorsement as another’s, as provided
for in Section 1623 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 27
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

172. 171. Erasure or alterations with intent to defraud, as
provided for in Section 1624 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
173. 172. Sign fictitious name as officer of corporation, as
provided for in Section 1626 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
174. 173. Fraudulent insolvency of corporation, as provided for
in Section 1639 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
175. 174. Workers’ compensation fraud, as provided for in
Section 1663 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
176. 175. Willfully poisoning animal, as provided for in
Section 1681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
177. 176. Larceny of lost property, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in paragraph 3 of Section 1702 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
178. 177. Grand larceny, value from Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00), as
provided for in subsection A of Section 1705 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
179. 178. Larceny of written instrument, as provided for in
Section 1709 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
180. 179. Receive, possess, or conceal stolen property, value
from Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 28
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Thou sand Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1713 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
181. 180. Bringing stolen property into state, value from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1715 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
182. 181. Larceny of dogs, as provided for in Section 1718 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
183. 182. Larceny of or receiving stolen fowls, as provided for
in Section 1719 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
184. 183. Larceny of domesticated fish or game, value One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, as provided for in Section
1719.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
185. 184. Larceny of auto, aircraft, or other motor vehicle,
value less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), as provided for
in Section 1720 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
186. 185. Larceny from building or house, as provided for in
Section 1723 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
187. 186. Possession of mercury, as provided for in Section
1726 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
188. 187. Entering with intent to steal copper, as provided for
in Section 1727 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 29
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

189. 188. Possessing, receiving, or transporting stolen copper,
as provided for in Section 1728 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
190. 189. Larceny of merchandise from retailer, value from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in subsection A of Section
1731 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
191. 190. Larceny of trade secrets, value from Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1732 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
192. 191. Procuring, selling, or receiving telephone records by
fraud (single telephone record), as provided for in subsection A of
Section 1742.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
193. 192. Injury to or obstruction of railroad, as provided for
in Section 1751 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
194. 193. Interfering with railroad, as provided for in Section
1752.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
195. 194. Possess, use, manufacture, or threaten to use
incendiary device or explosives without injury, as provided for in
Section 1767.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
196. 195. Removing or injuring piles securing bank or dam, as
provided for in Section 1777 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 30
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

197. 196. Maliciously injuring written instrument, value from
Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 1779 of Title 21 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
198. 197. Place hard object or inflammable object in grain or
cotton, as provided for in Section 1837 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
199. 198. Selling five or more unlawful telecommunication
devices within six (6) months, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1873 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
200. 199. Manufacturing five or more unlawful
telecommunications devices within six (6) months, as provided for in
subsection B of Section 1874 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
201. 200. Unauthorized removal of baggage or cargo from bus or
terminal, as provided for in Section 1904 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
202. 201. Access computer system or network with unlawful
intent, as provided for in Section 1958 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes this title;
203. 202. Reproduction of sound recording without consent, one
hundred (100) or more articles, as provided for in Section 1976 of
Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 31
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

204. 203. Unlawfully sell sound recordings, as provided for in
Section 1977 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
205. 204. Broadcast or live recording for sale without consent,
as provided for in Section 1978 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
206. 205. Rent or sell articles without true name of
manufacturer, as provided for in Section 1979 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes this title;
207. 206. Counterfeiting recording or article label, as
provided for in Section 1980 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
208. 207. Violation of Trademark Anti-Counterfeiting Act, as
provided for in Section 1990.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
209. 208. Tampering with security equipment, as provided for in
Section 1993 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this title;
210. 209. Sex offender engaging in ice cream truck vending, as
provided for in Section 2100.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes
this title;
211. 210. Protective order violation, second or subsequent
offense, as provided for in subsection A of Section 60.6 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 32
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

212. 211. Protective order violation resulting in physical
injury, as provided for in subsection B of Section 60.6 of Title 22
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
213. 212. Disposal of seized liquor by officer, as provided for
in Section 1263 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
214. 213. False affidavits, as provided for in Section 1264 of
Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
215. 214. Interfering with voting machine, as provided for in
Section 9-118 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
216. 215. Voting illegally, as provided for in Section 16-102
of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
217. 216. Removing ballot from or carrying ballot into polling
place, as provided for in Section 16-102.1 of Title 26 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
218. 217. False application for an absentee ballot, as provided
for in Section 16-102.2 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
219. 218. False affidavit in voting registration, as provided
for in Section 16-103 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
220. 219. Causing unqualified persons to be invalidly
registered, as provided for in Section 16-103.1 of Title 26 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
221. 220. False notarization of absentee ballot, as provided
for in Section 16-104 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 33
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

222. 221. Perpetrate fraud or theft to affect election, as
provided for in Section 16-105 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
223. 222. Bribes to influence votes, as provided for in Section
16-106 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
224. 223. Offer bribe to withdraw as candidate, as provided for
in Section 16-107 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
225. 224. Solicit or accept bribe for withdrawal of candidacy,
as provided for in Section 16-108 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
226. 225. Prevent person from registering to vote or voting, as
provided for in Section 16-109 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
227. 226. Printing or possession of ballots illegally, as
provided for in Section 16-120 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
228. 227. Violation of the Oklahoma Pollutant Discharge
Elimination System Act, as provided for in subsection G of Section
2-6-206 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
229. 228. Falsely state information to the Department of
Environmental Quality, as provided for in Section 2-7-109 of Title
27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
230. 229. Falsify information on permit application for
Oklahoma Solid Waste Management Act, as provided for in Section 2-
10-302 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 34
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

231. 230. Violation of use of solid waste disposal sites, as
provided for in Section 2-10-801 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
232. 231. Filing false sale with Insurance Commissioner, as
provided for in Section 311.1 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
233. 232. Selling insurance with revoked or suspended license,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
234. 233. Aiding or conspiring with a person whose insurance
license is revoked or suspended, as provided for in subsection B of
Section 1435.26 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
235. 234. False statements, reports, or filings with intent to
deceive Insurance Commissioner, as provided for in subsection E of
Section 1643 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
236. 235. Violation of the Viatical Settlements Act of 2008,
value from Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to Two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), as provided for in subsection F of
Section 4055.14 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
237. 236. Violation of prepaid funeral provisions, as provided
for in Section 6130 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
238. 237. Out-of-state retailer shipping alcoholic beverages
into state, as provided for in Section 3-101 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 35
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

239. 238. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or
consume alcohol, as provided for in subsection A of Section 6-101 of
Title 37A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
240. 239. Permit invitee under twenty-one (21) to possess or
consume alcohol resulting in great bodily injury or death, as
provided for in subsection C of Section 6-101 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
241. 240. Sale of alcoholic beverages outside of authorized day
or hours, as provided for in Section 6-123 of Title 37A of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
242. 241. Disclosing confidential information concerning
violation of Employment Security Act of 1980, as provided for in
Section 4-508 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
243. 242. Hiring armed guards without permit, as provided for
in Section 169 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
244. 243. Causing employee death by commanding to enter steam
boiler, as provided for in Section 183 of Title 40 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
245. 244. False statement about lien by contractor, as provided
for in Section 142.4 of Title 42 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
246. 245. Mechanics liens/embezzlement, valued from Two
Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) to Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), as provided for in Section 142.6 of Title 42
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 36
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

247. 246. Marrying prohibited persons, as provided for in
Section 14 of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
248. 247. Bigamy and remarriage, as provided for in Section 123
of Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
249. 248. Mistreatment of mental health patient, as provided
for in Section 2-219 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
250. 249. Violation of opioid substitution treatment program,
as provided for in Section 3-601 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
251. 250. Coerce another to execute a declaration of revocation
of an advanced directive, as provided for in subsection D of Section
11-113 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
252. 251. Unauthorized use of implement of husbandry, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-102 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
253. 252. Receive, possess, or conceal implement of husbandry,
as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-103 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
254. 253. Removed, falsified, or unauthorized identification,
as provided for in subsection A of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
255. 254. Buy, receive, possess, or sell motor vehicle with VIN
removed or defaced with intent to conceal, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 4-107 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 37
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

256. 255. Destroying, removing, altering, covering, or
counterfeiting trim tag plates, as provided for in Section 4-107a of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
257. 256. Misuse of manufactured home certificate of title, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
258. 257. Alter manufactured home certificate of title, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
259. 258. Remove receipt with intent to misrepresent payment of
tax or fees, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of
Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
260. 259. Purchase registration receipt on assigned certificate
of title, as provided for in subsection B of Section 4-110 of Title
47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
261. 260. Misuse of forged, counterfeit, or suspended driver
license, as provided for in Section 6-301 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
262. 261. Perjury through false affidavit, as provided for in
Section 6-302 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
263. 262. Interference with traffic control device resulting in
injury or death, as provided for in subsection B of Section 11-207
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 38
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

264. 263. Buy, sell, or dispose vehicle with altered VIN, chop
shop, as provided for in subsection C of Section 1503 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
265. 264. Attempt to violate chop shop laws, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 1503 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
266. 265. Perjury before the Corporation Commission, as
provided for in Section 108 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
267. 266. Delay probation duties of the Corporation Commission
with use or attempted use of firearms, as provided for in Section
114 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
268. 267. Conspiracy to violate Oklahoma Oil and Gas
Conservation Act, as provided for in Section 115 of Title 52 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
269. 268. Corruption of Corporation Commission, as provided for
in Section 117 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
270. 269. Misappropriation of gas, as provided for in Section
235 of Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
271. 270. Falsification of application for emergency relief, as
provided for in Section 26.18 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
272. 271. Medicaid fraud, as provided for in Section 1005 of
Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
273. 272. Fraudulently obtaining or receiving assistance, value
of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or more, as provided for in
Section 1005.1 of Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 39
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

274. 273. Carry contraband into jail or prison, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
275. 274. Possess cell phone in jail or prison, as provided for
in subsection E of Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
276. 275. Jail employee receiving compensation from inmate,
value of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or more, as provided for in
Section 22 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
277. 276. Use of convict labor on private property, as provided
for in Section 222 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
278. 277. Failure to comply with Mary Rippy Violent Crime
Offenders Registration Act, as provided for in Section 599 of Title
57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
279. 278. Practicing dentistry without a license, as provided
for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
280. 279. Giving false information to obtain license, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 328.49 of Title 59 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
281. 280. Impersonating a pharmacist, as provided for in
Section 353.17A of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
282. 281. Alteration of prescription or unlawful dispensing of
drugs, second violation, as provided for in Section 353.24 of Title
59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 40
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

283. 282. False representation in procuring license under the
Oklahoma Pharmacy Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section
353.25 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
284. 283. Cremation without license and permit, as provided for
in Section 396.33 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
285. 284. Practicing medicine without a license, as provided
for in Section 491 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
286. 285. Violation of the Oklahoma Osteopathic Medicine Act,
as provided for in Section 638 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
287. 286. Acting as building inspector without a license, as
provided for in Section 1044 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
288. 287. Affidavit as to undertaking, as provided for in
Section 1322 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
289. 288. Bail jumping, as provided for in Section 1335 of
Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
290. 289. False declaration of ownership in pawn shop, value of
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more, if property is firearms,
or was acquired through robbery or burglary, as provided for in
subsection C of Section 1512 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
291. 290. Violation of Oklahoma Security Guard and Private
Investigator Act, as provided for in subsection B of Section 1750.11
of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
292. 291. Collusion among bidders, as provided for in Section
115 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 41
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

293. 292. Disclosure of terms of bids, as provided for in
Section 116 of Title 61 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
294. 293. False or illegal voucher by public official, as
provided for in Section 81 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
295. 294. Use of facsimile signature or seal with intent to
defraud, as provided for in Section 604 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
296. 295. Distribution of controlled substance, possession with
intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided for in subsection
A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
297. 296. Distribution of counterfeit controlled substance,
possession with intent, Schedule III, IV, and V drugs, as provided
for in subsection A of Section 2-401 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
298. 297. Robbery of controlled dangerous substance, as
provided for in subsection B of Section 2-403 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
299. 298. Distribute or dispense controlled substance without
required order form, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
300. 299. Manufacture, distribute, or dispense controlled
substance not authorized by registration, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 42
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

301. 300. Omit, remove, alter, or obliterate symbol required on
controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-
404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
302. 301. Refuse or fail to make, keep, or furnish required
information, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
303. 302. Refuse entry or inspection of premises with respect
to controlled substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section
2-404 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
304. 303. Maintain place for keeping or selling controlled
substance, as provided for in subsection A of Section 2-404 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
305. 304. Sell, transfer, or provide money transmitter
equipment to unlicensed person, second or subsequent offense, as
provided for in subsection A of Section 2-503.1d of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
306. 305. Responsibility of permit holders, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 124.8 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
307. 306. Purchase or sell body parts for transplantation, as
provided for in Section 2200.16A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
308. 307. Falsification, forgery, concealment, defacement, or
obliteration of document of gift, as provided for in Section
2200.17A of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 43
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

309. 308. Unlawful possession of vessel or motor, as provided
for in Section 4209 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
310. 309. Receive, possess, sell, or dispose of stolen vessel
or motor, as provided for in Section 4209.1 of Title 63 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
311. 310. Remove or alter ID number of vessel, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
312. 311. Buy, receive, possess, or dispose of vessel with
false ID number with intent to conceal, as provided for in
subsection D of Section 4209.2 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
313. 312. False statement in application for certificate of
title for stolen vehicle, as provided for in Section 4209.3 of Title
63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
314. 313. Alteration or forging of vessel certificate of title,
as provided for in Section 4209.4 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
315. 314. Possess vessel with altered ID number, as provided
for in subsection C of Section 4253 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
316. 315. Destroying or falsifying checks to the Land Office,
as provided for in Section 1026 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 44
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

317. 316. Prospecting on public lands without permit, as
provided for in Section 1094 of Title 64 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
318. 317. Business for profit by a member of the Department of
Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 304 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
319. 318. Business for profit by a member of the Department of
Transportation, as provided for in subsection B of Section 324 of
Title 66 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
320. 319. Failure to comply with request for county records, as
provided for in Section 83 of Title 67 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
321. 320. Refusal to file tax return with intent to defraud, as
provided for in Section 240.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
322. 321. Filing false sales tax report, as provided for in
Section 241 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
323. 322. Possession of controlled dangerous substances without
tax stamp, as provided for in Section 450.8 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
324. 323. Remove tax stamp with intent to reuse, as provided
for in Section 450.9 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
325. 324. Making false oath to report required by Cotton
Manufacturers Act, as provided for in Section 2003 of Title 68 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 45
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

326. 325. File false income tax return with intent to defraud,
as provided for in Section 2376 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
327. 326. Fraudulent tax receipt by county treasurer, as
provided for in Section 2920 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
328. 327. False or fraudulent lists of taxable property, as
provided for in Section 2945 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
329. 328. False application under Oklahoma Quality Jobs Program
Act, as provided for in Section 3609 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
330. 329. False application under Former Military Facility
Development Act, as provided for in Section 3807 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
331. 330. False application under Oklahoma Specialized Quality
Investment Act, as provided for in Section 4109 of Title 68 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
332. 331. False application under Oklahoma Quality Investment
Act, as provided for in Section 4209 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
333. 332. Conflict of interest by a member of the
Transportation Commission, as provided for in Section 310 of Title
69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 46
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

334. 333. Conflict of interest by a member of the Oklahoma
Turnpike Authority, as provided for in Section 1705 of Title 69 of
the Oklahoma Statutes;
335. 334. Violation of Oklahoma Highway Code of 1968, as
provided for in Section 1802 of Title 69 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
336. 335. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Educational
Television Authority member, as provided for in Section 23-106 of
Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
337. 336. Alter or destroy audit records by Board of Regents,
as provided for in subsection E of Section 3909 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
338. 337. Authority to receive gifts or funds, as provided for
in subsection B of Section 4306 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
339. 338. Make takeover offer which is not effective under
Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of 1985, as provided for in
subsection A of Section 453 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
340. 339. Fraudulent, deceptive, or manipulative acts in
takeover offer, as provided for in Section 455 of Title 71 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
341. 340. Violation of Oklahoma Take-over Disclosure Act of
1985, as provided for in Section 460 of Title 71 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 47
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

342. 341. Conflict of interest by Oklahoma Capitol Improvement
Authority member, as provided for in Section 162 of Title 73 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
343. 342. Fraud in obtaining certification as a minority
business, as provided for in Section 85.45h of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
344. 343. False statement for small business surety bond
guarantee, as provided for in Section 85.47h of Title 74 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
345. 344. Forge or alter criminal history record, as provided
for in subsection D of Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
346. 345. Making or receiving kickback, as provided for in
Section 3404 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
347. 346. Pooling of bridge or highway contracts, as provided
for in Section 101 of Title 79 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
348. 347. Business for profit by Oklahoma Water Resources Board
member, as provided for in Section 1086.3 of Title 82 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;
349. 348. Conflict of interest by water district official or
employee, as provided for in Section 1281 of Title 82 of the
Oklahoma Statutes;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 48
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

350. 349. Falsely executes a written declaration as a witness
to a will, as provided for in paragraph 6 of Section 55 of Title 84
of the Oklahoma Statutes; and
351. 350. False statement and misrepresentation, as provided
for in Section 6 of Title 85A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any person convicted of a Class D1 criminal offense set
forth in this section shall be punished by imprisonment in the
custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not more than
five (5) years and shall serve at least twenty percent (20%) of the
sentence imposed before release from custody including release to
electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Every person who, having been previously convicted of
one or two Class C or Class D criminal offenses, commits a Class D1
criminal offense shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment
in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of not
less than one (1) year nor more than seven (7) years and shall serve
at least twenty percent (20%) of the sentence imposed before release
from custody including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to
Section 510.9 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
2. Every person who, having been previously convicted of three
Class C or Class D criminal offenses, or one or more Class Y, Class
A, or Class B criminal offenses, commits a Class D1 criminal offense
shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the custody
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 49
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of t he Department of Corrections for a term of not less than two (2)
years nor more than ten (10) years and shall serve at least thirty
percent (30%) of the sentence imposed before release from custody
including release to electronic monitoring pursuant to Section 510.9
of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
D. Unless specifically exempted pursuant to subsection E of
this section, Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title shall not apply to Class D1 criminal offenses.
E. The criminal offenses listed in paragraphs 98, 108, 212 211,
213 212, and 229 228 of subsection A of this section shall be exempt
from the penalty provisions provided for in subsections B and C of
this section. Persons convicted of the criminal offenses provided
for in paragraphs 98, 108, 212 211, 213 212, and 229 228 of
subsection A of this section shall be punished in accordance with
the corresponding penalties provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes
including Section 51.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes this
title.
F. All Class D1 criminal offenses shall be punishable by the
corresponding fines as provided for in the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1171, as
amended by Section 403, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1171), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1171. A. Every 1. Any person who hides, waits, or
otherwise loiters in the vicinity of any private dwelling house,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 50
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

apar tment building, any other place of residence, or in the vicinity
of any locker room, dressing room, restroom, or any other place
where a person has a right to a reasonable expectation of privacy,
with the unlawful and willful intent to watch, gaze, or look upon
any person in a clandestine manner, shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of a misdemeanor. The violator shall be punished punishable
by imprisonment in the county jail for a term of not more than one
(1) year, or by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars
($5,000.00), or by both such fine imprisonment and imprisonment
fine.
2. Any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B5 felony offense
punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for a term not more than five (5) years, or by a fine
not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such
imprisonment and fine.
B. Every Any person who uses photographic, electronic, or video
equipment in a clandestine manner for any illegal, illegitimate,
prurient, lewd, or lascivious purpose with the unlawful and willful
intent to view, watch, gaze, or look upon any person without the
knowledge and consent of such person when the person viewed is in a
place where there is a right to a reasonable expectation of privacy,
or who publishes or distributes any image obtained from such act,
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class D1 Class B5 felony
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 51
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

offe nse. The violator shall be punished punishable by imprisonment
as provided for in subsections B through F of Section 20N of this
title in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term not
more than five (5) years, or by a fine not exceeding to exceed Five
Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine imprisonment and
imprisonment fine.
C. Every 1. Any person who uses photographic, electronic, or
video equipment in a clandestine manner for any illegal,
illegitimate, prurient, lewd, or lascivious purpose with the
unlawful and willful intent to view, watch, gaze, or look upon any
person and capture an image of a private area of a person without
the knowledge and consent of such person and knowingly does so under
circumstances in which a reasonable person would believe that the
private area of the person would not be visible to the public,
regardless of whether the person is in a public or private place
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor. The violator
shall be punished punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for
a term of not more than one (1) year, or by a fine not exceeding to
exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine
imprisonment and imprisonment fine.
2. Any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class B5 felony offense
punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of
Corrections for a term not more than five (5) years, or by a fine
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 52
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such
imprisonment and fine.
D. As used in this section, the phrase “private area of the
person” means the naked or undergarment-clad genitals, pubic area,
buttocks, or any portion of the areola of the female breast of that
individual.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 582, as
amended by Section 14, Chapter 151, O.S.L. 2024 (57 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 582), is amended to read as follows:
Section 582. A. The provisions of the Sex Offenders
Registration Act shall apply to any person residing, working, or
attending school within the State of Oklahoma this state who, after
November 1, 1989, has been convicted, whether upon a verdict or plea
of guilty or upon a plea of nolo contendere, or received a suspended
sentence or any probationary term, or is currently serving a
sentence or any form of probation or parole for a crime or an
attempt to commit a crime provided for in Section 843.5 of Title 21
of the Oklahoma Statutes if the offense involved sexual abuse or
sexual exploitation as those terms are defined in Section 1-1-105 of
Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 681, if the offense
involved sexual assault, 741, if the offense involved sexual abuse
or sexual exploitation, Section 748, if the offense involved human
trafficking for commercial sex, Section 843.1, if the offense
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation, Section 852.1, if the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 53
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

offe nse involved sexual abuse of a child, 856, if the offense
involved child sex trafficking or human trafficking for commercial
sex, 865 et seq., 885, 886, 888, 891, if the offense involved sexual
abuse or sexual exploitation, 1021, 1021.2, 1021.3, 1024.2, 1029, if
the offense involved child sex trafficking, 1040.8, if the offense
involved child pornography sexual abuse material, 1040.12a, 1040.13,
1040.13a, 1087, 1088, 1111.1, 1114 or, 1123, paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 1171, subsection B of Section 1171, or
paragraph 2 of subsection C of Section 1171 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.
B. The provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall
apply to any person who after November 1, 1989, resides, works, or
attends school within the State of Oklahoma this state and who has
been convicted or received a suspended sentence at any time in any
court of another state, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam,
American Samoa, the Northern Mariana Islands, and the United States
Virgin Islands, a federal court, an Indian tribal court, a military
court, or a court of a foreign country for a crime, attempted crime,
or a conspiracy to commit a crime which, if committed or attempted
in this state, would be a crime, an attempt to commit a crime, or a
conspiracy to commit a crime provided for in any of the laws listed
in subsection A of this section.
C. The provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall
apply to any person who resides, works, or attends school within the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 54
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Stat e of Oklahoma this state and who has received a deferred
judgment at any time in any court of another state, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Mariana
Islands, and the United States Virgin Islands, a federal court, an
Indian tribal court, a military court, or a court of a foreign
country for a crime, attempted crime, or a conspiracy to commit a
crime which, if committed or attempted or conspired to be committed
in this state, would be a crime, an attempt to commit a crime, or a
conspiracy to commit a crime provided for in Section 843.5 of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes if the offense involved sexual abuse or
sexual exploitation as those terms are defined in Section 1-1-105 of
Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, Section 681, if the offense
involved sexual assault, 741, if the offense involved sexual abuse
or sexual exploitation, Section 748, if the offense involved human
trafficking for commercial sex, Section 843.1, if the offense
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation, Section 852.1, if the
offense involved sexual abuse of a child, 856, if the offense
involved child sex trafficking or human trafficking for commercial
sex, 865 et seq., 885, 886, 888, 891, if the offense involved sexual
abuse or sexual exploitation, 1021, 1021.2, 1021.3, 1024.2, 1029, if
the offense involved child sex trafficking, 1040.8, if the offense
involved child pornography sexual abuse material, 1040.12a, 1040.13,
1040.13a, 1087, 1088, 1111.1, 1114, or 1123, paragraph 2 of
subsection A of Section 1171, subsection B of Section 1171, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 55
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

para graph 2 of subsection C of Section 1171 of Title 21 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. The provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration
Act shall not apply to any such person while the person is
incarcerated in a maximum or medium correctional institution of the
Department of Corrections.
D. On November 1, 2002, any person registered as a sex offender
pursuant to Section 741 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall
be summarily removed from the Sex Offender Registry by the
Department of Corrections and all law enforcement agencies of any
political subdivision of this state, unless the offense involved
sexual abuse or sexual exploitation.
E. The provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall
not apply to any such person who has received a criminal history
records expungement for a conviction in another state for a crime or
attempted crime which, if committed or attempted in this state,
would be a crime or an attempt to commit a crime provided for in any
laws listed in subsection A of this section.
F. The provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall
apply to any person residing, working, or attending school within
this state who, after the effective date of this act November 1,
1989, has been convicted, whether upon a verdict or plea of guilty
or upon a plea of nolo contendere, or received a suspended sentence
or any probationary term, or is currently serving a sentence or any
form of probation or parole for a crime or an attempt to commit a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 56
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

crim e as provided for in subsection G of Section 1040.13b of Title
21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
G. The provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act shall
apply to any person who resides, works, or attends school within
this state and who has received a deferred judgment at any time in
any court of another state, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico,
Guam, American Samoa, the Northern Mariana Islands, and the United
States Virgin Islands, a federal court, an Indian tribal court, a
military court, or a court of a foreign country for a crime, if
committed in this state, would be a crime, as provided for in
subsection F G of Section 1040.13b of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes. The provisions of the Sex Offenders Registration Act
shall not apply to any such person while the person is incarcerated
in a maximum or medium correctional institution of the Department of
Corrections.
SECTION 5. REPEALER 57 O.S. 2021, Section 582, as
amended by Section 41, Chapter 59, O.S.L. 2024 (57 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 582), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
February 17, 2026 - DO PASS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1460 SFLR Page 57
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)